Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2779XS (1) 91 ll/ns S.F. 486 Section 1. Section 123.22, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. However, alcohol may be manufactured for industrial and 3 nonbeverage purposes by persons who have qualified for that 4 purpose as provided by the laws of the United States and the 5 laws of this state. Such alcohol, so manufactured, may be 6 denatured, transported, used, possessed, sold, and bartered 7 and dispensed, subject to the limitations, prohibitions , and 8 restrictions imposed by the laws of the United States and this 9 state. Additionally, an individual may manufacture alcoholic 10 liquor when participating in a supervised distilling class at a 11 native distillery as provided in section 123.43A, subsection 9. 12 Sec. 2. Section 123.43A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. A native distillery holding a class 15 âAâ native distilled spirits license that does not also hold a 16 class âCâ retail alcohol license for the same licensed premises 17 as the native distillery may provide supervised distilling 18 classes to individuals subject to all of the following: 19 a. Individuals conducting the classes and participating in 20 the classes shall be of legal age. 21 b. The amount of alcoholic liquor each individual 22 participating in each class may produce shall be limited to 23 seven hundred fifty milliliters. 24 c. Alcoholic beverages, including the alcoholic liquor 25 produced in the class, shall not be consumed on the premises. 26 This paragraph does not prohibit tastings of native distilled 27 spirits conducted in accordance with subsection 3. 28 d. The native distillery shall remit to the department in 29 a manner as directed by the department an amount equivalent 30 to fifty percent of the wholesale price for the alcoholic 31 liquor being manufactured by the individuals in the distilling 32 class that is also generally the same type of alcoholic liquor 33 manufactured by the native distillery and listed for sale by 34 the department. 35 -1- LSB 2779XS (1) 91 ll/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 486 e. A native distillery shall allow not more than three 1 hundred gallons of alcoholic liquor to be produced on an annual 2 basis by individuals participating in distilling classes. 3 f. The director may adopt rules establishing processes and 4 procedures to support operational, product, and public safety 5 in distilling classes conducted under this subsection. 6